Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-3914
Judicial district public defender; qualifications.

A judicial district public defender shall be a lawyer duly admitted to and engaged in the practice of law in Nebraska.

Laws 1969, c. 234, § 6, p. 865;

R.S.1943, (1989), § 29-1805.06;

Laws 1990, LB 822, § 32.